Utah statutes.
78B-13-304.   Temporary parent-time.
(1)  A court of this state which does not have jurisdiction to modify a child
custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:
(a)  a parent-time schedule made by a court of another state; or
(b)  the parent-time provisions of a child custody determination of another
state that does not provide for a specific parent-time schedule.
(2)  If a court of this state makes an order under Subsection (1)(b), it shall
specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the
petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the
criteria specified in Part 2, Jurisdiction.  The order remains in effect until
an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.
